West Virginia, session 2026, HB4690.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2E. HIGH QUALITY EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS. §1. Repeal of sections related to Office of Education Performance Audits and Mountain State Digital Literacy Project. That §18-2E-5 and §18-2E-12 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 2I. professional DEVELOPMENT. §1. Repeal of section related to professional development for West Virginia public school educators. That §18-2I-1 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, is repealed. ARTICLE 3. STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS. §1. Repeal of section related to Behavioral Interventionists Pilot Program. That §18-3-13 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, is repealed. ARTICLE 8. COMPULSORY SCHOOL ATTENDANCE. §1. Repeal of section related to the High School Graduation Improvement Act. That §18-8-6 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, is repealed.